Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) Cities and towns must allow child care centers, and the conversion of existing buildings for use as child care centers, as an outright permitted use in all zones except industrial zones.(2) Cities may impose reasonable restrictions on the permit, including pickup and drop-off areas.(3) Cities that plan under the growth management act and that are required to submit their next comprehensive plan update in 2027 pursuant to RCW 36.70A.130 must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, the requirements of this section in their next comprehensive plan update. All other cities must implement the requirements of this section within two years of the effective date of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) Code cities and towns must allow child care centers, and the conversion of existing buildings for use as child care centers, as an outright permitted use in all zones except industrial zones.(2) Code cities may impose reasonable restrictions on the permit, including pickup and drop-off areas.(3) Code cities that plan under the growth management act and that are required to submit their next comprehensive plan update in 2027 pursuant to RCW 36.70A.130 must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, the requirements of this section in their next comprehensive plan update. All other code cities must implement the requirements of this section within two years of the effective date of this section.--- END ---